Utah statutes.
52-1-2.   Bonds to state -- Approval and recording -- Filing of oaths.

Whenever state officers, officials of state institutions, or other persons, are required to give official bonds to the state, the bonds, unless otherwise provided, shall be approved by the Division of Finance, and recorded by the state treasurer in a book kept for that purpose. The oaths of office of all state officials shall be filed with the Division of Archives.

